Hawaii statutes.
§832-12 Confinement in jail when necessary.
The officer or persons executing the governor's warrant of arrest, or the agent
of the demanding state to whom the prisoner may have been delivered may, when
necessary, confine the prisoner in the jail of any county through which he may
pass; and the keeper of the jail must receive and safely keep the prisoner
until the officer or person having charge of him is ready to proceed on his
route, such officer or person being chargeable with the expense of keeping.

The officer or agent of a demanding state to
whom a prisoner may have been delivered following extradition proceedings in
another state, or to whom a prisoner may have been delivered after waiving
extradition in such other state, and who is passing through this State with
such a prisoner for the purpose of immediately returning the prisoner to the
demanding state may, when necessary, confine the prisoner in the jail of any
county through which he may pass; and the keeper of the jail must receive and
safely keep the prisoner until the officer or agent having charge of him is
ready to proceed on his route, such officer or agent, however, being chargeable
with the expense of keeping; provided that the officer or agent shall produce
and show to the keeper of the jail satisfactory written evidence of the fact
that he is actually transporting the prisoner to the demanding state after a
requisition by the executive authority of the demanding state. The prisoner
shall not be entitled to demand a new requisition while in this State. [L 1941,
c 99, §12; RL 1945, §10642; RL 1955, §250-12; HRS §713-12; ren L 1972, c 9, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next